Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3922
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the County Revenue Assistance Act:

(1) Chief counsel means an attorney appointed to be the primary administrative officer of the commission pursuant to section 29-3928;

(2) Commission means the Commission on Public Advocacy;

(3) Commission staff means attorneys, investigators, and support staff who are performing work for the capital litigation division, appellate division, DNA testing division, and major case resource center;

(4) Contracting attorney means an attorney contracting to act as a public defender pursuant to sections 23-3404 to 23-3408;

(5) Court-appointed attorney means an attorney other than a contracting attorney or a public defender appointed by the court to represent an indigent person;

(6) Indigent defense services means legal services provided to indigent persons by an indigent defense system in capital cases, felony cases, misdemeanor cases, juvenile cases, mental health commitment cases, child support enforcement cases, and paternity establishment cases;

(7) Indigent defense system means a system of providing services, including any services necessary for litigating a case, by a contracting attorney, court-appointed attorney, or public defender;

(8) Indigent person means a person who is indigent and unable to obtain legal counsel as determined pursuant to subdivision (4) of section 29-3901; and

(9) Public defender means an attorney appointed or elected pursuant to sections 23-3401 to 23-3403.

Laws 1995, LB 646, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 335, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 659, § 15;

Laws 2009, LB154, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 27;

Referendum 2016, No. 426;

Laws 2026, LB965, § 37.
July 18, 2026The changes made to section 29-3922 by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 27, have been omitted because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.